Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.026

Contracts—Proprietary data, trade secrets, actuarial formulas, statistics, cost and utilization data—Exemption from public inspection—Executive sessions.

(1) When soliciting proposals for the purpose of awarding contracts for goods or services, the director shall, upon written request by the bidder, exempt from public inspection and copying such proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information contained in the bidder's proposal that relate to the bidder's unique methods of conducting business or of determining prices or premium rates to be charged for services under terms of the proposal.

(2) When soliciting information for the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care services, the director shall, upon written request by the respondent, exempt from public inspection and copying such proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information submitted by the respondent that relate to the respondent's unique methods of conducting business, data unique to the product or services of the respondent, or to determining prices or rates to be charged for services.

(3) Actuarial formulas, statistics, cost and utilization data, or other proprietary information submitted upon request of the director, board, or a technical review committee created to facilitate the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under this chapter by a contracting insurer, health care service contractor, health maintenance organization, vendor, or other health services organization may be withheld at any time from public inspection when necessary to preserve trade secrets or prevent unfair competition.

(4) The board or a technical review committee created to facilitate the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under this chapter, may hold an executive session in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW during any regular or special meeting to discuss information submitted in accordance with subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(5) A person who challenges a request for or designation of information as exempt under this section is entitled to seek judicial review pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2018 c 260 s 9; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 805; 2005 c 274 s 277; 2003 c 277 s 2; 1991 c 79 s 1; 1990 c 222 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.